Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 7, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 241, O.S.L. 2022 (43 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 7), is amended to read as follows:
Section 7. A. All marriages must be contracted by a formal
ceremony performed or solemnized in the presence of at least two
adult, competent persons as witnesses, by a judge or retired judge
HB2205 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

of a ny court in this state, or an ordained or authorized preacher
or, minister of the Gospel, priest, deacon, elder of the Gospel,
priest, or other ecclesiastical dignitary of any denomination who
has been duly ordained or authorized by the church to which he or
she belongs to preach the Gospel, or a rabbi and who is at least
eighteen (18) years of age.
B. 1. The judge shall place his or her order of appointment on
file with the office of the court clerk of the county in which he or
she resides.
2. The preacher, minister, priest, deacon, elder, rabbi, or
ecclesiastical dignitary shall certify on the marriage certificate
that he or she holds credentials or authority from his or her church
or synagogue authorizing him or her to solemnize marriages.
C. No person herein authorized to perform or solemnize a
marriage ceremony shall do so unless he or she has good reason to
believe the persons presenting themselves before him or her for
marriage are the identical persons named in the license, and for
whose marriage the same was issued, and that there is no legal
objection or impediment to such marriage.
D. Marriages between persons belonging to the society called
Friends, or Quakers, the spiritual assembly of the Baha'is, or the
Church of Jesus Christ of Latter Day Saints, which have no ordained
minister, may be solemnized by the persons and in the manner

HB2205 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

pres cribed by and practiced in any such society, church, or
assembly.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/27/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended.



















HB2205 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.